incubator/apertium-ell-eng/apertium-ell-eng.ell.dix
    <pardef n="υπερσυντ/έλικος__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>έλικος</l><r>έλικος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έλικο</l><r>έλικος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ελίκου</l><r>έλικος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έλικε</l><r>έλικος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="χτ/ήμα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ήμα</l><r>ήμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμα</l><r>ήμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήματος</l><r>ήμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμα</l><r>ήμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήματα</l><r>ήμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήματα</l><r>ήμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ημάτων</l><r>ήμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήματα</l><r>ήμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/έντομο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>έντομο</l><r>έντομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έντομο</l><r>έντομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εντόμου</l><r>έντομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έντομο</l><r>έντομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έντομα</l><r>έντομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έντομα</l><r>έντομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εντόμων</l><r>έντομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έντομα</l><r>έντομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ρ/άδιο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>άδιο</l><r>άδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άδιο</l><r>άδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αδίου</l><r>άδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άδιο</l><r>άδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άδια</l><r>άδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άδια</l><r>άδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αδίων</l><r>άδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άδια</l><r>άδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="αβά/ς__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ς</l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>δες</l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>δες</l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>δων</l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>δες</l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="διαστημ/όπλοιο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>όπλοιο</l><r>όπλοιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όπλοιο</l><r>όπλοιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οπλοίου</l><r>όπλοιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όπλοιο</l><r>όπλοιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όπλοια</l><r>όπλοιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όπλοια</l><r>όπλοιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οπλοίων</l><r>όπλοιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όπλοια</l><r>όπλοιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/άμαξα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>άμαξα</l><r>άμαξα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άμαξα</l><r>άμαξα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άμαξας</l><r>άμαξα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άμαξα</l><r>άμαξα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άμαξες</l><r>άμαξα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άμαξες</l><r>άμαξα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αμαξών</l><r>άμαξα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άμαξες</l><r>άμαξα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="εξ/ήγηση__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ήγηση</l><r>ήγηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήγηση</l><r>ήγηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήγησης</l><r>ήγηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηγήσεως</l><r>ήγηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήγηση</l><r>ήγηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηγήσεις</l><r>ήγηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηγήσεις</l><r>ήγηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηγήσεων</l><r>ήγηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηγήσεις</l><r>ήγηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="εγχε/ίρηση__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ίρηση</l><r>ίρηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίρηση</l><r>ίρηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίρησης</l><r>ίρηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιρήσεως</l><r>ίρηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίρηση</l><r>ίρηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιρήσεις</l><r>ίρηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιρήσεις</l><r>ίρηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιρήσεων</l><r>ίρηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιρήσεις</l><r>ίρηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="πολ/ώνιο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ώνιο</l><r>ώνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνιο</l><r>ώνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ωνίου</l><r>ώνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνιο</l><r>ώνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="άμαξα"><i></i><par n="/άμαξα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="έντομο"><i></i><par n="/έντομο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αβάς"><i>αβά</i><par n="αβά/ς__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αββάς"><i>αββά</i><par n="αβά/ς__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="διαστημόπλοιο"><i>διαστημ</i><par n="διαστημ/όπλοιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="εγχείρηση"><i>εγχε</i><par n="εγχε/ίρηση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="εξήγηση"><i>εξ</i><par n="εξ/ήγηση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="κτήμα"><i>κτ</i><par n="χτ/ήμα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="πλουτώνιο"><i>πλουτ</i><par n="πολ/ώνιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="πολώνιο"><i>πολ</i><par n="πολ/ώνιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ράδιο"><i>ρ</i><par n="ρ/άδιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="στάδιο"><i>στ</i><par n="ρ/άδιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="υπερσυντέλικος"><i>υπερσυντ</i><par n="υπερσυντ/έλικος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="χτήμα"><i>χτ</i><par n="χτ/ήμα__n_nt"/></e>
